Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202654-1,137
Registered dairy heifer development facility; rules and regulations.

The brand committee may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to ensure compliance with the Livestock Brand Act by registered dairy heifer development facilities, to provide for the availability of shipping certificates to registered dairy heifer development facilities, and to ensure that proper records are maintained by registered dairy heifer development facilities.

Laws 2026, LB1187, § 23.
July 18, 2026